West Virginia, session 2026, SB1026.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 6. Crimes against the peace. §61-6-13. Disturbance of religious worship; penalty. (a) If any person willfully interrupts, obstructs, or substantially disturbs any assembly of people meeting for religious worship, he or she is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be confined in jail not more than one year and fined not less than  $250 nor more than  $1,000 for each violation. (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit peaceful picketing, protest, or other expressive conduct protected by the First Amendment that does not willfully interrupt, obstruct, or substantially disturb any assembly of persons meeting for religious worship. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home